Maryland, session 2025, SB0729.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Safety
3–303.
(a) The following entities may apply for the appointment of special police officers
for the following purposes:
(1) a municipal corporation, county, or other governmental body of the
State, in order to protect property owned, leased, or regularly used by the governmental
body or any of its units;
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0729*

SENATE BILL 729
(2) A COUNTY, IN ORDER TO PROTECT THE COUNTY’S EMPLOYEES
AND PUBLIC OFFICIALS WHILE PRESENT IN THE COUNTY;
(3) another state, or subdivision or unit of another state, that has an
interest in property located wholly or partly in this State, in order to protect the property;
[(3)] (4) a college, university, or public school system in the State, in order
to protect its property or students; or
[(4)] (5) a person that exists and functions for a legal business purpose,
in order to protect its business property.
(b) The applicant for a commission shall be at least 18 years old.
(c) (1) This subsection does not apply to an applicant for an initial commission
who, within 5 years prior to application, has:
(i) completed a basic training course for police officers approved by
the Secretary in consultation with the Maryland Police Training and Standards
Commission;
(ii) completed a basic training course for police officers similar to the
course described in item (i) of this paragraph in another state or for the federal government;
(iii) separated from a law enforcement agency in good standing; or
(iv) completed training approved by the Maryland Police Training
and Standards Commission for a special police officer at a State institution of higher
education.
(2) An applicant for an initial commission shall complete a training course
approved by the Secretary in consultation with the Maryland Police Training and
Standards Commission consisting of at least 80 hours of instruction, including instruction
on:
(i) criminal law;
(ii) constitutional procedural requirements relating to search,
seizure, and arrest; and
(iii) the appropriate use of force.
3–307.
(a) Each special police officer shall protect and preserve peace and good order on
the property described in the application for the commission.

SENATE BILL 729 3
(b) A special police officer may:
(1) arrest individuals who trespass or commit offenses on the property
described in the application for the commission;
(2) exercise the powers of a police officer on the property described in the
application for the commission;
(3) exercise the powers of a police officer in a county or municipal
corporation of the State in connection with the care, custody, and protection of other
property of the entity that requested the appointment of the special police officer or other
property, real or personal, for which the entity has assumed an obligation to maintain or
protect; [and]
(4) direct and control traffic on public highways and roads in the immediate
vicinity of the property described in the application for the commission in order to facilitate
the orderly movement of traffic to and from the property, if the Secretary approves of this
activity in advance; AND
(5) IF EMPLOYED BY A COUNTY FOR THE PURPOSE OF PROVIDING
PROTECTION TO THE COUNTY’S EMPLOYEES AND PUBLIC OFFICIALS, EXERCISE THE
POWERS OF A POLICE OFFICER IN CONNECTION WITH AND NECESSARY FOR
PROTECTING THE EMPLOYEES AND OFFICIALS WHOM THE SPECIAL POLICE OFFICER
IS ASSIGNED TO PROTECT.
(c) (1) A special police officer may make an arrest or issue a traffic citation for
a violation of the Maryland Vehicle Law or any other State or local traffic law or regulation
only if the special police officer:
(i) has a probationary or permanent appointment as a security
officer or is a member of an industrial police force; and
(ii) has completed the basic training course for police officers as
established by the Maryland Police Training and Standards Commission in accordance
with Subtitle 2 of this title.
(2) A special police officer may exercise the power described in paragraph
(1) of this subsection only on the property of the special police officer’s employer as described
in the application for the commission, unless the special police officer is in active pursuit
for the purpose of immediate apprehension.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.